Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-205
First appropriators; date of priority.

The priority of an appropriation shall date from the filing of the application with the Chief Water Officer of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 1895, c. 69, § 31, p. 254;

R.S.1913, § 3373;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 1, § 5, p. 832;

C.S.1922, § 8410;

C.S.1929, § 46-505;

R.S.1943, § 46-205;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 94;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 70.